Vermont, session 2025-2026, H349.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 29 V.S.A. § 171 is amended to read:
§ 171. RESPONSIBILITY FOR SECURITY
(a) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services Vermont State
Building Security Board shall be responsible for ensuring the security of all
State facilities, regardless of funding source for construction or renovation, the
lands upon which those facilities are located, and the occupants of those
facilities and places, and State-owned or State-leased buildings that house a
court plus one or more other functions, in those buildings that function
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 2 of 8
exclusively as courthouses, and the space occupied by the Supreme Court,
except that:,
(1) in those State-owned or State-leased buildings that house a court plus
one or more other functions, security for the space occupied by the court shall
be under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and security elsewhere shall be
under the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services;
(2) in those buildings which function exclusively as courthouses, security
shall be under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court;
(3) the space occupied by the Supreme Court shall be under the
jurisdiction of the Supreme Court; and
(4) in the State House, security shall be under the jurisdiction of the
Sergeant at Arms.
(b) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services Vermont State
Building Security Board shall develop a security plan for each facility, except
for those under the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and of the Sergeant at
Arms State House, and shall regularly update these plans as necessary and be
responsible for coordinating responses to all security needs. The Supreme
Court and the Sergeant at Arms shall, in cooperation with the Commissioner of
Buildings and General Services Vermont State Building Security Board,
prepare and update such plans for the facilities under their respective
jurisdictions the Sergeant at Arms’ jurisdiction.
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 3 of 8
(c) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services Vermont State
Building Security Board may delegate the responsibility for security at
specified facilities.
(d) All security improvements to State facilities shall be under the direction
of the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services Vermont State
Building Security Board, who which shall set statewide standards for policies,
materials, and equipment, including voice and data reception and transmission
upgrades and installations.
(e) Under this section, the Commissioner of Buildings and General
Services Vermont State Building Security Board is responsible for the
protection of State facilities, the lands upon which the facilities are situated,
and the occupants of those facilities, which is vital to sustaining the essential
services of government in an emergency. The Commissioner Board shall
develop plans for continuity of government and continuity of operations as an
addendum to the State emergency operations plan maintained by the
Department of Public Safety, Division of Emergency Management and
referenced in 20 V.S.A. § 8(b)(2).
(f) The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, Vermont State
Building Security Board and the Sergeant at Arms, and the Court
Administrator shall execute a memorandum of understanding to coordinate the
provision of security plans and law enforcement services within the Capitol
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 4 of 8
Complex. The memorandum of understanding shall incorporate any existing
agreements related to the provision of law enforcement services or security in
the Capitol Complex. As used in this section, “Capitol Complex” has the same
meaning as used in section 182 of this title.
Sec. 2. 29 V.S.A. § 173 is added to read:
§ 173. VERMONT STATE BUILDING SECURITY BOARD
(a) The Vermont State Building Security Board is established to oversee
the safety and security of worksites for Vermont State employees and the
employees of the Judiciary.
(b)(1) The Board shall consist of the following seven members:
(A) two members, appointed by the Governor;
(B) the Vermont State Court Administrator or designee;
(C) one member, appointed by the Attorney General; and
(D) three members, appointed by the President of the Vermont State
Employees’ Association.
(2) The Board shall annually, from among its membership, elect a
member to serve as Board chair and a member to serve as Board vice chair.
(3) The members of the Board shall serve terms of six years and may
serve not more than two consecutive terms. All appointments shall be made
between January 1 and February 1 of each odd-numbered year, except to fill a
vacancy. Members shall serve until their successors are appointed.
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 5 of 8
(4) Membership on the Board does not constitute the holding of an
office for any purpose, and members of the Board shall not be required to take
and file oaths of office before serving on the Board. A member of the Board
shall not be disqualified from holding any public office or employment and
shall not forfeit any office or employment by reason of the member’s
appointment to the Board, notwithstanding any statute, ordinance, or charter to
the contrary.
(c) The Board shall hold at least four regular meetings a year. Meetings of
the Board may be held at any time or place within Vermont upon call of the
Chair or a majority of the members, after reasonable notice to the other
members, and shall be held at such times and places as in the judgment of the
Board will best serve the convenience of all parties in interest. The Board shall
adopt rules and procedures with respect to the conduct of its meetings and
other affairs.
(d) Members who are not State employees or not otherwise compensated in
the course of their employment shall receive per diem compensation and
expense reimbursement for meetings in accordance with the provisions of
32 V.S.A. § 1010. Members who receive per diem shall receive compensation
for not more than 12 meetings per year.
(e) The Board shall appoint the Director of Safety and Security who shall
hold office at the pleasure of the Board. The Director shall:
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 6 of 8
(1) Develop and implement, annually, a comprehensive plan to ensure
security for State and Vermont Judiciary employees.
(2) Compile an annual report on the number and type of security
incidents concerning State employees and the employees of the Vermont
Judiciary. This report shall be provided annually to the House Committees on
Corrections and Institutions and on Government Operations and Military
Affairs and the Senate Committees on Government Operations and on
Institutions.
(3) Perform such duties as may be assigned by the Board.
(f) The Director of Safety and Security is entitled to compensation, as
established by law, and reimbursement for the expenses within the amounts
available by appropriation. The Director of Safety and Security may, with the
approval of the Board, hire employees to fulfill the duties outlined in
subsection (e) of this section. These employees shall be classified State
employees.
(g) The Director of Safety and Security shall partner with the Department
of Buildings and General Services, whose staff shall be responsible for the
installation, maintenance, and replacement of physical plant alterations
necessary for the implementation of the Director’s security plan.
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 7 of 8
Sec. 3. 29 V.S.A. § 174 is added to read:
§ 174. BUILDINGS AND COURTHOUSES POLICE DEPARTMENT
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Courthouse” means a building or any portion of a building
designated by the Supreme Court of Vermont as a courthouse.
(2) “State building” means a building or any portion of a building
designated by the Director of Safety and Security, in consultation with the
Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, as a State building.
(b) Creation. The Buildings and Courthouses Police Department is created
within the Department of Public Safety. The Commissioner of Public Safety
shall appoint and may remove, at the Commissioner’s pleasure, a Buildings
and Courthouses Police Department officer to serve as Chief. The Chief shall
be an exempt State employee and shall appoint individuals to serve as
additional Buildings and Courthouses Police Department officers. All such
positions shall be classified State employees. The Chief shall supervise the
officer force. Such appointments and all oaths or affirmations shall be in
writing and filed with the Commissioner of Public Safety.
(c) Powers; training.
(1) A Buildings and Courthouses Police Department officer shall have
all the same powers and authority as sheriffs and other law enforcement
officers anywhere in the State, which shall include the authority to arrest
VT LEG #380950 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.349
2025 Page 8 of 8
persons and enforce the civil and criminal laws, keep the peace, provide
security, and serve civil and criminal process. For this purpose, a Buildings
and Courthouses Police Department officer shall subscribe to the same oaths
required for sheriffs.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a
Buildings and Courthouses Police Department officer shall be a Level II or
Level III law enforcement officer certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice
Training Council pursuant to the provisions of 20 V.S.A. chapter 151, except
that the Chief of the Buildings and Courthouses Police Department shall be a
Level III certified law enforcement officer.
(d) Coordination of State building and courthouse security. The Buildings
and Courthouses Police Department shall provide security and law
enforcement services for State buildings and courthouses.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380950 v.2